Idaho, session 2025, H0095.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 34-901, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-901. OFFICIAL ELECTION BALLOT IDENTIFICATION. (1) The county clerk
shall provide that all election ballots are identified as official. Each
ballot shall have upon on its face the date and year of the election in which
it is used and the words "Official Election Ballot."
(2) The clerk in a county that utilizes optical scan ballots shall en-
sure that:
(a) The official election ballot identification is printed on each bal-
lot issued; and
(b) Each ballot contains a unique marking alphanumeric identifier
printed on each ballot to prevent duplication of official election bal-
lots.
(3) The clerk in a county that utilizes paper or other ballots shall
provide an official election stamp of such character or device and of such
material as the board of county commissioners may select. In the event such
stamp is lost, destroyed or unavailable upon on election day, the distribut-
ing clerk shall initial each ballot and write "stamped" upon on the ballot in
the appropriate place.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.